Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5529
Start date, defined.

Start date means the first date after the date of the application on which a qualified investment, that is either all or a part of a building in the project, is placed in service by the owner. For purposes of this definition, placed in service has the same meaning as that used for the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.

Laws 2001, LB 620, § 29.